Wyoming statutes. Title 14 Children
Article 6. Juvenile Justice Information System [Renumbered from Wyo. Stat. Title 7, Ch. 19, Art. 5, effective July 1, 2024]

History.

Renumbered from Wyo. Stat. Title 7, Ch. 19, Art. 5 by 2022 ch. 15, § 3, effective July 1, 2024.

§ 14-6-601.
Definitions. [Renumbered from Wyo. Stat. § 7-19-501, effective July 1, 2024]

As used in this act:

“Adjudicated” or “adjudication” means as defined by W.S. 14-6-201(a)(i);

“Adult” means an individual who has attained the age of majority;

“Delinquent child” means as defined by W.S. 14-6-201(a)(x);

“Disposition” means the action ordered by the juvenile court judge under W.S.

14-6-229

upon adjudication of a juvenile for a delinquent act or the sentence imposed on a juvenile who is convicted;

“Department” means the department of family services;

“Juvenile” means an individual who is under the age of majority;

“Qualifying offense” means conduct that, if committed by an adult, would constitute a felony under the provisions of W.S. 6-1-104(a)(xii) or

35-7-1031

or under similar federal law;

“Conviction” or “convicted” means a conviction of a juvenile of a qualifying offense or a conviction for any offense for which the juvenile was charged in a circuit court or district court;

“Detention” means the legal and physical restriction and housing of a juvenile at the Wyoming state hospital, the Wyoming boys’ school, the Wyoming girls’ school or a juvenile detention facility defined in W.S. 14-6-201(a)(xxiv). “Detention” shall not include any placement in a qualified residential treatment program as defined by W.S. 14-6-201(a)(xxviii) or a residential treatment facility that is operated for the primary purpose of providing treatment to a juvenile;

“This act” means W.S.

14-6-601

through

14-6-606

.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 118, § 1; renumbered from Wyo. Stat. §

7-19-501

by 2022 ch. 15, § 3, effective July 1, 2024.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2024, added “or the sentence imposed on a juvenile who is convicted” in (a)(iv); rewrote (a)(v), which read, “‘Division’ means the Wyoming division of criminal investigation within the office of the attorney general”; added (a)(viii) and (a)(ix); redesignated former (a)(viii) as (a)(x); and in present (a)(x), substituted “14-6-601” for “7-19-501” and “14-6-606” for “7-19-505.”

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 14-6-602.
Record system created. [Renumbered from Wyo. Stat. § 7-19-502, effective July 1, 2024]

The department shall create and maintain a database for a juvenile justice information system as provided in this act.

The database shall contain the information required by this act. Access to information in the database shall be limited as provided by W.S.

14-6-604

.

The department shall promulgate reasonable rules and regulations necessary to carry out the provisions of this act. The department shall annually report by March 1 to the joint judiciary interim committee on the numbers of entries and usage of the database and overall compliance with this act.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 118, § 1; renumbered from Wyo. Stat. §

7-19-502

by 2022 ch. 15, § 3, effective July 1, 2024.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2024, substituted “department” for “division” throughout the section; substituted “14-6-604” for “7-19-504” in (b); and added “and overall compliance with this act” in the second sentence of (c).

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 7-19-501(a)(viii).

§ 14-6-603.
Collection of juvenile justice information. [Renumbered from Wyo. Stat. § 7-19-503, effective July 1, 2024]

In any case in which a juvenile is convicted or is adjudicated a delinquent child for the commission of a qualifying offense or a criminal act, the court shall direct that, to the extent possible, the following information be collected and provided to the department:

Offender identification information including:

The juvenile offender’s name, including other names by which the juvenile is known, and social security number;

The juvenile offender’s date of birth;

The juvenile offender’s physical description, including sex, weight, height, race, ethnicity, eye color, hair color, scars, marks and tattoos;

The juvenile offender’s last known residential address.

Repealed by Laws 2022, ch. 15, § 5.

Offense identification information including:

The criminal offense for which the juvenile was convicted or adjudicated delinquent;

Identification of the juvenile court in which the juvenile was adjudicated delinquent or the court in which the juvenile was convicted; and

The date and description of the final disposition ordered by the court.

The nature of the disposition ordered by the court, including whether a juvenile is:

Committed to detention;

Ordered to serve probation, placed under a plan of supervision or ordered to participate in an intensive supervision program;

Committed to treatment;

Held in pretrial detention.

Repealed by Laws 2022, ch. 15, § 5.

The department may designate codes relating to the information described in subsection (a) of this section.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 118, § 1; renumbered from Wyo. Stat. §

7-19-503

by 2022 ch. 15, §§ 3, 5, effective July 1, 2024.

The 2022 amendment,

by ch. 15, §§ 3, 5, effective July 1, 2024, in the introductory language of (a), added “convicted or is” preceding “adjudicated,” “or a criminal act” following “offense,” substituted “department” for “division”; deleted “and place” following “date” in (a)(i)(B); deleted “and” at the end of (a)(i)(D) and made a related change; added “convicted or” in (a)(ii)(A); added “or the court in which the juvenile was convicted” in (a)(ii)(B); deleted “juvenile” preceding “court” in (a)(ii)(C); added (a)(iii); substituted “department” for “division” in (c); repealed former (a)(i)(E), which read, “The juvenile offender's fingerprints”; and repealed former (b), which read, “The information maintained by the division shall not include predisposition studies and reports, social summaries, medical or psychological reports, educational records, multidisciplinary team minutes and records or transcripts of dispositional hearings.”

§ 14-6-604.
Access to and dissemination of information. [Renumbered from Wyo. Stat. § 7-19-504, effective July 1, 2024]

Information contained in the juvenile justice information system shall be accessible, whether directly or through an intermediary, to:

Other criminal justice agencies, including the division of criminal investigation;

Any person designated for the purpose provided by W.S.

14-6-227

;

Repealed by Laws 2022, ch. 15, § 5.

An individual who has met the requirements established by the department to ensure the record will be used solely as a statistical research or reporting record and that the record is to be transferred in a form that is not individually identifiable;

Any record subject as provided by W.S.

7-19-109

.

The department may by rule promulgate a process in which, when a subject reaches the age of majority, all information in the juvenile justice information system pertaining to that subject can be preserved in a manner to avoid identification of an individual subject while still allowing for longitudinal data analyses of recidivism.

Any person who willfully violates subsection (a) or (b) of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be fined not more than five hundred dollars ($500.00). Any person or entity who violates subsection (a) of this section shall be denied further access to the system.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 118, § 1; renumbered from Wyo. Stat. §

7-19-504

by 2022 ch. 15, §§ 3, 5, effective July 1, 2024.

The 2022 amendment,

by ch. 15, §§ 3, 5, effective July 1, 2024, added “, including the division of criminal investigation” in (a)(i); substituted “department” for “division”; in (b), added “The department may by rule promulgate a process in which,” substituted “can be preserved in a manner to avoid identification of an individual subject while still allowing for longitudinal data analyses of recidivism” for “shall be deleted,” made a related change; and repealed former (a)(iii), which read, “The department of family services if the subject is in the custody of the department.”

§ 14-6-605.
Inspection of information. [Renumbered from Wyo. Stat. § 7-19-505, effective July 1, 2024]

An individual, his parents and guardian have the right to inspect all juvenile justice record information located within this state which refers to that individual in accordance with W.S.

7-19-109

.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 118, § 1; renumbered from Wyo. Stat. §

7-19-505

by 2022 ch. 15, § 4, effective July 1, 2024.

§ 14-6-606.
Standardization of juvenile justice information. [Effective July 1, 2024]

The department shall facilitate the standardization, identification, sharing and coordination of juvenile justice information collected and provided to the department and disseminated by the department as required by this act. The department shall work with all federal, state and local entities that provide information under this act.

The department shall promulgate rules to adopt uniform information collection standards, methodologies and best practices for the collection and dissemination of juvenile justice information under this act. Any state agency or local governmental entity required to submit information under this act shall comply with the rules promulgated under this subsection.

The department shall be responsible for assuring the consistency of participation by any state agency or local governmental entity required to provide juvenile justice information under this act or that seeks to access juvenile justice information under this act.

History.

2022 ch. 15, § 1, effective July 1, 2024.

Effective date. —

Laws 2022, ch, 15, § 8, makes the act effective July 1, 2024.